West Virginia, session 2026, HB4636.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 40. WEST VIRGINIA REAL ESTATE LICENSE ACT. §30-40-3. License required. It is unlawful for any person to engage in directly or indirectly, or to advertise or hold himself or herself out as engaging in or carrying on the business or act in the capacity of a real estate broker, associate broker, or salesperson sales agent within this state without first obtaining a license as provided for in this article. Prior to practicing real estate brokerage in this state, a license shall be obtained from the commission even if the person or entity is licensed in another state and is affiliated or otherwise associated with a licensed real estate broker in this state. §30-40-4. Definitions. Unless the context used clearly requires a different meaning, as used in this article: "Applicant" means any person who is making application to the commission for a license. "Associate broker" means any person who qualifies for a broker’s license, but who is employed or engaged by a licensed broker to engage in any activity regulated by this article, in the name of and under the direct supervision of the licensed broker. "Broker" means any person who for compensation or with the intention or expectation of receiving or collecting compensation:(1) Lists, sells, purchases, exchanges, options, rents, manages, leases, or auctions any interest in real estate; or(2) Directs or assists in the procuring of a prospect calculated or intended to result in a real estate transaction; or(3) Advertises or holds himself or herself out as engaged in, negotiates, or attempts to negotiate, or offers to engage in any activity enumerated in subdivision (1) of this subsection."Cancelled" means a license that was not renewed by December 31 of the year in which license expired;"Commission" means the West Virginia Real Estate Commission as established §30-40-6 of this code."Compensation" means fee, commission, salary, or other valuable consideration, in the form of money or otherwise. "Designated broker" means a person holding a broker's license who has been appointed by a partnership, association, corporation, or other form of business organization engaged in the real estate brokerage business, to be responsible for the acts of the business and to whom the partners, members, or board of directors have delegated full authority to conduct the real estate brokerage activities of the business organization."Distance education" means courses of asynchronous instruction in which instruction takes place through media where the teacher and student are separated by time."Entity" means a business, company, corporation, limited liability company, association, or partnership."Expired" means a license that was not renewed by July 1."Inactive" means a licensee who is not authorized to conduct any real estate business and is not required to comply with any continuing education requirements."License" means a license to act as a broker, associate broker, or salesperson sales agent."Licensee" means a person holding a license."Member" means a commissioner of the Real Estate Commission."Principal" means a person or entity that authorizes a licensee to act on his, her, or its behalf."Property management" means the overseeing and management of commercial and residential real estate properties.  This includes taking care of all of the daily operations for a property which may include, but is not limited to, collecting rent, collecting or holding security deposits on behalf of the property owner, handling maintenance, paying vendors for repairs, and fielding tenant complaints.  The amount of responsibilities the property manager has depends on their contract with the owner of the property."Real estate" means any interest or estate in land, and anything permanently affixed to land."Salesperson" "Sales agent" means a person employed or engaged by or on behalf of a broker to do or deal in any activity included in this article, in the name of and under the direct supervision of a broker, other than an associate broker: Provided, That for the purposes of receiving compensation, a salesperson sales agent may designate an entity to receive any compensation payable to the salesperson sales agent, including, but not limited to, a limited liability corporation or an S-corporation."Team" means any group of two or more associate brokers and/or salespersons sales agents, and other non-licensed professionals, affiliated with the same broker or company acting as one agent representative for the principal. §30-40-5. Scope of practice; exceptions. (a) The practice of real estate brokerage includes acting in the capacity of a broker, associate broker, or salesperson sales agent as defined in §30-40-4 of this code.(b) The practice of real estate brokerage does not include the activities normally performed by an appraiser, mortgage company, lawyer, engineer, contractor, surveyor, home inspector, or other professional who may perform an ancillary service in conjunction with a real estate transaction.(c) The provisions of this article do not apply to:(1) Any person acting on his or her own behalf as owner or lessor of real estate.(2) The regular employees of an owner of real estate, who perform any acts regulated by this article, where the acts are incidental to the management of the real estate: Provided, That the employee does not receive additional compensation for the act and does not perform the act as a vocation.(3) Attorneys-at-law: Provided, That attorneys-at-law shall be required to submit to the written examination required under §30-40-12 of this code in order to qualify for a broker’s license: Provided, however, That an attorney-at-law who is licensed as a real estate broker prior to July 1, 1980, is exempt from the written examination required under §30-40-12 of this code.(4) Any person holding, in good faith, a valid power of attorney from the owner or lessor of the real estate.(5) Any person acting as a receiver, trustee, administrator, executor, guardian, conservator, or under the order of any court or under the authority of a deed of trust or will.(6) A public officer while performing his or her official duties.(7) Any person acquiring or disposing of any interest in timber or minerals, or acquiring or disposing of properties for easements and rights of way. (8) Any person employed exclusively to act as the management or rental agent for the real estate of one person or entity.(9) Any person properly licensed pursuant to the provisions of §19-2C-1 et seq.  of this code when conducting an auction, any portion of which contains any leasehold or estate in real estate, only when the person so licensed is retained to conduct an auction by:(A) A receiver or trustee in bankruptcy;(B) A fiduciary acting under the authority of a deed of trust or will; or(C) A fiduciary of a decedent’s estate.(10) Any person employed by a broker in a noncommissioned secretarial or clerical capacity who may in the normal course of employment, be required to:(A) Disseminate brokerage preprinted and predetermined real estate sales and rental information;(B) Accept and process rental reservations or bookings for a period not to exceed 30 consecutive days in a manner and procedure predetermined by the broker;(C) Collect predetermined rental fees for the rentals which are to be promptly tendered to the broker;(D) Make appointments on behalf of the broker or licensed salesperson sales agent with buyers and sellers of real estate and potential buyers and sellers of real estate; or(E) Any combination thereof. §30-40-6. Commission created; membership; appointment and removal of members; qualifications; terms; organization. (a) The West Virginia Real Estate Commission is hereby continued. The members of the commission in office on the date this section takes effect shall, unless sooner removed, continue to serve until their respective terms expire and until their successors have been appointed and qualified.(b)(1) Commencing with the terms beginning with July 1, 2002, the commission shall consist of five persons appointed for terms of four years by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. Four commissioners must be licensed under the provisions of this article and one commissioner must be a citizen member who is not licensed under the provisions of this article.(2) Each licensed commissioner, at the time of his or her appointment, must have been licensed and practiced in this state as a real estate broker, associate broker or salesperson sales agent as his or her primary vocation for a period of not less than ten years immediately preceding the appointment. Each commissioner must have been a resident of this state for at least six years prior to his or her appointment and must remain a resident during the appointment term. No more than four commissioners shall belong to the same political party.(3) The appointment of three licensed commissioners, whether for a full term or to fill a vacancy, shall be made by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The appointment of one licensed commissioner, whether for a full term or to fill a vacancy, shall be made by the Governor from among three nominees selected by the West Virginia association of realtors. If the appointment is for a full term, the nominations must be submitted to the Governor not later than three months prior to the date on which the appointment becomes effective. If the appointment is to fill a vacancy, the nominations must be submitted to the Governor within thirty days after a request for the nominations has been made by the Governor to the West Virginia association of realtors. If the association fails to submit nominations in accordance with the requirements of this section, the Governor may make the appointment without the nominations.(c) Any commissioner immediately and automatically forfeits his or her membership on the commission if he or she has his or her license to practice as a real estate broker, associate broker or salesperson sales agent suspended or revoked by the board, is convicted of a felony under the laws of this state or of the United States, becomes a nonresident of this state, or holds any elective public office or becomes a member of any political committee.(d) No member of the commission may be removed from office by the Governor except for official misconduct, incompetency, neglect of duty, gross immorality or other good cause, but then only in the manner prescribed by law for the removal by the Governor of state elective officials.(e) No member of the commission may serve more than two consecutive full terms and any member having served two full terms may not be appointed for one year after completion of his or her second full term. A member shall continue to serve until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified.(f) The Governor shall designate one member of the commission as chairman and the members shall choose a vice chairman and a secretary, each of whom shall continue to serve in their respective capacity until replaced.(g) Three members shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of official business.(h) Each commissioner shall receive the same compensation as is paid to members of the Legislature for their interim duties as recommended by the citizens legislative compensation commission and authorized by law for each day or portion thereof engaged in the discharge of official duties. Each commissioner shall be reimbursed for his or her actual and necessary expenses for each day or portion thereof engaged in the discharge of official duties in a manner consistent with guidelines of the travel management office of the Department of Administration. §30-40-11. Application for license. The commission shall only issue an original license to an applicant if he or she:(a) Submits an application, in writing, on a form prescribed by the commission which shall contain, but is not limited to:(1) The applicant’s Social Security number;(2) A clear record indicating all jurisdictions where the applicant holds or has held any professional license;(3) A clear record indicating if the applicant has been convicted of any criminal offense or if there is any criminal charge pending against the applicant, or a member or officer of the brokerage business, at the time of application;(b) Is at least 18 years of age;(c) Is a high school graduate or the holder of an equivalency diploma;(d) Is trustworthy, of good moral character, and competent to transact the business of a broker, associate broker, or salesperson sales agent;(e) Has paid the appropriate fee, if any, which shall accompany all applications for original license or renewal;(f) Has submitted to a state and national criminal history record check, as set forth in this subsection: Provided, That an applicant for a license who is an attorney at law may submit a letter of good standing from the West Virginia State Bar in lieu of submitting to a state and national criminal history record check;(1) This requirement is found not to be against public policy.(2) The criminal history record check shall be based on fingerprints submitted to the West Virginia State Police or its assigned agent for forwarding to the Federal Bureau of Investigation.(3) The applicant shall meet all requirements necessary to complete the state and national criminal history record check, including:(A) Submitting fingerprints for the purposes set forth in this subsection; and(B) Authorizing the commission, the West Virginia State Police, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to use all records submitted and produced for the purpose of screening the applicant for a license.(4) The results of the state and national criminal history record check may not be released to or by a private entity except:(A) To the individual who is the subject of the criminal history record check;(B) With the written authorization of the individual who is the subject of the criminal history record check; or(C) Pursuant to a court order.(5) The criminal history record check and related records are not public records for the purposes of chapter 29B of this code.(6) The applicant shall pay the actual costs of the fingerprinting and criminal history record check.(7) Before implementing the provisions of this subsection, the commission shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code. The rules shall set forth the requirements and procedures for the criminal history record check and must be consistent with standards established by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact as authorized by 42 U. S. C. A. §14611, et seq. §30-40-12. Qualifications for broker's license. (a) An applicant for a broker's license shall:(1) Submit evidence satisfactory to the commission of either: (i) Real estate experience as a licensed real estate salesperson sales agent during the two years prior to the date of application showing the applicant's representation of a buyer or seller in a minimum of  20 closed transactions; if the applicant is engaged solely in the leasing or renting of real estate, representation of the landlord or tenant in a minimum of  20 closed transactions of at least one year in duration; or if the applicant is engaged solely in the management of a real estate brokerage company, active involvement in a minimum of 20 closed transactions; or (ii) regardless of the number of years as a licensed salesperson sales agent: a minimum of  40 closed transactions; if the applicant is engaged solely in the leasing or renting of real estate, representation of the landlord or tenant in a minimum of  40 closed transactions of at least one year duration; or if the applicant is engaged solely in the management of a real estate brokerage company, active involvement in a minimum of  40 closed transactions. For the purposes of this section, a "closed transaction" means a transaction that resulted in the real estate being conveyed from seller to buyer in which the applicant represented the seller, buyer, or both, or a transaction that resulted in the consummation of a lease of no less than one year in duration in which the applicant represented either the landlord or tenant of the real estate;(2) Submit satisfactory evidence of having completed the required education course as provided for in §30-40-14 of this code; and(3) Successfully pass the examination or examinations provided by the commission.(b) No broker's license shall be issued in the name of an entity except through one of its members or officers.(c) No broker's license may be issued in the name of an entity unless each member or officer who will engage in the real estate business, obtains a license as a real estate salesperson sales agent or associate broker. §30-40-13. Qualifications for salesperson’s sales agent's license. (a) An applicant for a salesperson’s sales agent's license shall:(1) Submit satisfactory evidence of having completed the required education course as provided in §30-40-14 of this code; and(2) Successfully pass the examination or examinations provided by the commission.(b) No salesperson’s sales agent's license may be issued in the name of an entity except through one of its members or officers.(c) No salesperson’s sales agent's license may be issued in the name of an entity unless each member or officer, who will engage in the real estate business, obtains a license as a real estate salesperson sales agent or associate broker. §30-40-14. Prelicense education. (a) Applicants for a broker’s license shall provide evidence satisfactory to the commission that he or she has completed at least 180 clock-hours, equivalent to 12 college semester credit hours, in a course or courses approved by the commission: Provided, That an applicant for a broker’s license who holds a salesperson’s sales agent's license in this state shall be required to provide evidence that he or she has completed an additional 90 clock-hours, equivalent to six college semester hours, in a course or courses approved by the commission.(b) Applicants for a salesperson’s sales agent's license shall provide evidence satisfactory to the commission that he or she has completed 90 clock-hours, equivalent to six college semester credit hours, in a course or courses approved by the commission.(c) Any course required by subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall have been completed during the three-year period preceding the date of application in order to be accepted by the commission. §30-40-17. Place of business; branch offices; display of certificates; custody of license certificates; change of address; change of employer by a salesperson sales agent or associate broker; license certificates; term of license. (a) Every person holding a broker’s license under the provisions of this article shall:(1) Have and maintain a definite place of business within this state, which shall be a room or rooms used for the transaction of real estate business and any allied business. The definite place of business shall be designated in the license certificate issued by the commission and the broker may not transact business at any other location within this state, unless such other location is properly licensed by the commission as a branch office: Provided, That a nonresident broker who maintains a definite place of business in his or her jurisdiction of residence may not be required to maintain an office in this state;(2) Conspicuously display his or her branch office license in each branch office;(3) Make application to the commission before changing the address of any office or within 10 days after any change;(4) Maintain in his or her custody and control the license of each associate broker and salesperson sales agent affiliated with him or her; and(5) Promptly return the license of any associate broker or salesperson sales agent whose affiliation with the broker is terminated.(b) Every person holding an associate broker’s or salesperson’s sales agent's license under the provisions of this article shall:(1) Conduct real estate brokerage activities only under the direct supervision and control of his or her affiliated broker, which shall be designated in the license certificate; and(2) Promptly make application to the commission of any change of employing broker: Provided, That it shall be unlawful to perform any act contained in this article, either directly or indirectly, after affiliation has been terminated until the associate broker or salesperson sales agent has made application to the commission for a change of affiliated broker and the application is approved.(c) The commission shall issue a license certificate which shall:(1) Be in such form and size as shall be prescribed by the commission;(2) Display the seal of the commission and shall contain such other information as the commission may prescribe: Provided, That a salesperson’s sales agent's and an associate broker’s license shall show the name of the broker by whom he or she is affiliated;(3) If an active licensee, be mailed or delivered to the broker’s main office address;(4) If an inactive licensee, be held in the commission office; and(5) Be valid for a period that coincides with the fiscal year beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30. §30-40-19. Refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license. (a) The commission may refuse a license for reasonable cause or revoke, suspend, or impose any other sanction against a licensee if the licensee:(1) Obtains, renews, or attempts to obtain or renew a license, for himself, herself, or another, through the submission of any application or other writing that contains false, fraudulent, or misleading information;(2) Makes any substantial misrepresentation;(3) Makes any false promises or representations of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce a person involved in a real estate transaction;(4) Pursues a course of misrepresentation or makes false promises or representations through agents or any medium of advertising or otherwise;(5) Uses misleading or false advertising;(6) Uses any trade name or insignia of membership in any organization in which the licensee is not a member;(7) Acts for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge and written consent of all parties for whom he or she acts;(8) Fails, within a reasonable time, to account for or to remit moneys or other assets coming into his or her possession, which belong to others;(9) Commingles moneys belonging to others with his or her own funds;(10) Advertises or displays a "for sale", "for rent", or other such sign on any property without an agency relationship being established or without the owner’s knowledge and written consent;(11) Advertises any property on terms other than those authorized by the owner;(12) Fails to disclose, on the notice of agency relationship form promulgated by the commission, whether the licensee represents the seller, buyer, or both;(13) Fails to voluntarily furnish copies of the notice of agency relationship, listing contract, sale contract, lease contract, or any other contract to each party executing the same;(14) Pays or receives any rebate, profit, compensation, commission, or other valuable consideration, resulting from a real estate transaction, to or from any person other than the licensee’s principal: Provided, That this subsection may not be construed to prevent the sharing of compensation or other valuable consideration between licensed brokers;(15) Induces any person to a contract to break the contract for the purpose of substituting a new contract with a third party;(16) Accepts compensation as a salesperson sales agent or associate broker for any act specified in this article from any person other than his or her broker;(17) Pays compensation to any person for acts or services performed either in violation of this article or the real estate licensure laws of any other jurisdiction;(18) Pays compensation to any person knowing that they will pay a portion or all of that which is received, in a manner that would constitute a violation of this article if it were paid directly by a licensee of this state;(19) Violates any provision of this article, any rule, or any order or final decision issued by the commission;(20) Procures an attorney for any client or customer, or solicits legal business for any attorney-at-law;(21) Engages in the unlawful or unauthorized practice of law as defined by the Supreme Court of Appeals of West Virginia;(22) Commits or is a party to any material fraud, misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme, or other device whereby any other person relies upon the word, representation, or conduct of the licensee;(23) Continues in the capacity of, or accepts the services of, any broker, associate broker, or salesperson sales agent who is not properly licensed;(24) Fails to disclose any information within his or her knowledge or to produce any document, book, or record in his or her possession for inspection of and copying by the commission or its duly authorized representatives;(25) Accepts payment other than cash or its equivalent as earnest money or other deposit unless this fact is disclosed in the contract to which the deposit relates;(26) Accepts, takes, or charges any undisclosed compensation on expenditures made by or on behalf of the licensee’s principal;(27) Discriminates against any person involved in a real estate transaction which is in violation of any federal or state anti-discrimination law, including any fair housing law;(28) Fails to preserve for five years following its consummation, records relating to any real estate transaction;(29) Fails to maintain accurate records on the broker’s trust fund account;(30) If a broker, fails to supervise all associate brokers and salespersons sales agents affiliated with him or her;(31) Breaches a fiduciary duty owed by a licensee to his or her principal in a real estate transaction;(32) Directs any party to a real estate transaction in which the licensee is involved, to any lending institution for financing or to any affiliated business with the expectation of receiving a financial incentive, rebate, or other compensation, without first obtaining from his or her principal the signed acknowledgment of and consent to the receipt of the financial incentive, rebate, or other compensation: Provided, That this subsection may not be construed to prevent the sharing of compensation or other valuable consideration between licensed brokers;(33) Represents to any lending institution, or other interested party either verbally or through the preparation of false documents, an amount in excess of the true and actual sale price of the real estate or terms differing from those actually agreed upon;(34) Fails to disclose to an owner the licensee’s true position if he or she directly or indirectly through a third party, purchases for himself or herself or acquires or intends to acquire any interest in or any option to purchase the property;(35) Lends a broker’s license to any person, including a salesperson sales agent, or permits a salesperson sales agent to operate as a broker;(36) Has been convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction in this or any other jurisdiction of forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretense, bribery, larceny, extortion, conspiracy to defraud, any other similar offense, a crime involving moral turpitude, or a felony;(37) Engages in any act or conduct which constitutes or demonstrates bad faith, incompetency, untrustworthiness, or dishonest, fraudulent, or improper dealing;(38) Induces any person to alter, modify, or change another licensee’s fee or commission for brokerage services, without that licensee’s prior written consent;(39) Negotiates a real estate transaction directly with any person that is represented exclusively by another broker, unless the conduct is specifically authorized by the other broker;(40) Obtains, negotiates, or attempts to obtain or negotiate a contract whereby the broker is entitled to a commission only to the extent that the sales price exceeds a given amount, commonly referred to as a net listing;(41) Fails or refuses, on demand, to furnish copies of a document to a person whose signature is affixed to the document;(42) In the case of an associate broker or salesperson sales agent, represents or attempts to represent a broker other than his or her employing broker;(43) Fails to reduce a bona fide offer to writing;(44) Guarantees, or authorizes or permits another licensee to guarantee, future profits which may result from a real estate transaction;(45) Is disciplined by another jurisdiction if at least one of the grounds for that discipline is the same as or equivalent to one of the grounds for discipline in this article; or(46) Engages in any other act or omission in violation of professional conduct requirements of licensees established by legislative rule of the commission.(b) The provisions of this section shall be liberally construed in order to carry out the objectives and purposes of this article.(c) As used in this section:(1) The words "convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction" mean a plea of guilty or nolo contendere entered by a person or a verdict of guilt returned against a person at the conclusion of a trial;(2) A certified copy of a conviction order entered in a court is sufficient evidence to demonstrate a person has been convicted in a court of competent jurisdiction.(d) Every person licensed by the commission has an affirmative duty to report, in a timely manner, any known or observed violation of this article or the rules, orders, or final decisions of the commission.(e) The revocation of a broker’s license shall automatically suspend the license of every associate broker and salesperson sales agent affiliated with the broker: Provided, That the commission shall issue a replacement license for any licensee so affected to a new broker, without charge, if a proper application is submitted to the commission during the same license term. §30-40-23. Single act evidence of practice. One act by any person in consideration of receiving compensation, or with the expectation or intention of receiving such compensation, or upon the promise of receiving compensation for any act or service contained in this article shall constitute and consider the person a broker, associate broker or salesperson sales agent subject to the provisions of this article. §30-40-25. Collection of compensation. No person may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state for the recovery of compensation for the performance of any act or service for which a broker’s license is required, without alleging and proving that he or she was the holder of a valid broker’s license at all times during the performance or rendering of any act or service: Provided, That an associate broker or salesperson sales agent may institute suit in his or her own name for the recovery of compensation from his or her affiliated broker for acts or services performed while affiliated with the broker. §30-40-26. Duties of licensees. Every broker, associate broker, and salesperson sales agent owes certain inherent duties to the consumer which are required by virtue of the commission granting a license under this article. The duties include, but are not limited to:(a) At the time of securing any contract whereby the broker is obligated to represent a principal to a real estate transaction, every licensee shall supply a true legible copy of the contract to each person signing the contract.(b) Any contract in which a broker is obligated to represent a principal to a real estate transaction shall contain a definite expiration date, and no provision may be included in any contract whereby the principal is required to notify the broker of his or her intention to cancel the contract after the definite expiration date.(c) No provision may be inserted in any contract for representation that would obligate the person signing the contract to pay a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration to the broker, after the contract’s expiration date, if the person subsequently enters into a contract for representation with a different broker.(d) Every licensee shall disclose in writing, on the notice of agency relationship form promulgated by the commission, whether the licensee represents the seller, the buyer, the seller and the buyer, the landlord, the tenant, or the landlord and the tenant. The disclosure shall be made prior to any person signing any contract for representation by a licensee or a contract for the sale or purchase of real estate.(e) Every licensee shall promptly deliver to his or her principal, every written offer received.(f) Every licensee shall make certain that all the terms and conditions of a real estate transaction are contained in any contract prepared by the licensee.(g) At the time of securing the signature of any party to a contract, the licensee shall deliver a true copy of the contract to the person whose signature was obtained.(h) Upon the final acceptance or ratification of any contract, the licensee shall promptly deliver a true copy to each party that has signed the contract.